North Carolina, session 2025, HB64.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 5 of Article III of the North Carolina Constitution reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 5. Duties of Governor.
…
(6) Clemency. The Governor may grant reprieves, commutations, and pardons, after
conviction, conviction and commencement of sentence, for all offenses (except in cases of
impeachment), upon such conditions as he the Governor may think proper, subject to regulations
prescribed by law relative to the manner of applying for pardons. concurrence by a majority of
the members of each house of the General Assembly. In all such cases, the votes of both houses
shall be determined by yeas and nays, and the names of the members voting shall be entered on
the journal of each house respectively. If the Governor grants clemency when the General
Assembly has adjourned sine die or for more than 30 days jointly as provided under Section 20
of Article II of this Constitution, the Governor shall reconvene that session as provided by Section
5(11) of Article III of this Constitution for consideration of the grant, and if the Governor does
not reconvene the session, the grant shall fail. The terms reprieves, commutations, and pardons
shall not include paroles.
…."
SECTION 2. The amendment set out in Section 1 of this act shall be submitted to
the qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held on November 3, 2026,
which election shall be conducted in accordance with the laws governing elections at that time.
The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment limiting the Governor's power to grant clemency by
requiring the concurrence of the Legislature."
SECTION 3. The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the referendum
conducted under Section 2 of this act. If a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of
the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act, the Secretary of State shall enroll the amendment
among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of votes cast on the question are against
the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act, the amendment shall have no effect.
SECTION 4. If the certification from the State Board of Elections under Section 3
of this act reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of the amendment set
*H64-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
out in Section 1 of this act, the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act is effective upon
certification.
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 64-First Edition